South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5474.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Rates for electricity and natural gas shall not be increased for a period of one year. However, rates for electricity or natural gas may decrease during this period. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----